Utah statutes.
19-8-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Account" means the Environmental Voluntary Cleanup restricted account created under Section 19-8-103.

(2)  "Agreement" means a voluntary cleanup agreement under this chapter.

(3)  "Applicant" means the person:

(a)  who submits an application to participate in a voluntary cleanup agreement under this chapter; or

(b)  who enters into a voluntary cleanup agreement made under this chapter with the executive director.

(4)  "Completion" means, regarding property covered by an agreement:

(a)  no further response actions are necessary; or

(b)  the applicant is satisfactorily maintaining the engineering controls, remediation systems, postclosure care, and institutional controls to the extent required pursuant to the voluntary cleanup agreement.

(5)  "Contaminant" means:

(a)  hazardous materials as defined in Section 19-6-302;

(b)  hazardous substance as defined in Section 19-6-302;

(c)  hazardous waste as defined in Section 19-6-102;

(d)  hazardous waste constituent listed in 40 C.F.R. Part 261, Subpart D, or Table One, 40 C.F.R. 261.24;

(e)  pollution as defined in Section 19-5-102;

(f)  regulated substance as defined in Section 19-6-402; and

(g)  solid waste as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(6)  "Environmental assessment" means the assessment described in Section 19-8-107.

(7)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Utah Department of Environmental Quality or the executive director's representative.

(8)  "Program" means the Voluntary Environmental Cleanup Program created under this chapter.

(9)  "Response action" means the cleanup or removal of a contaminant from the environment.

(10)  "Solid waste" has the same meaning as defined in Section 19-6-102.

